Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 11 Ethics and Efficiency in Government Act

28-11-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Ethics and Efficiency in Government Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.

28-11-2.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the fundamental interests of the citizens of Georgia and of the legislature as an equal branch of state government to foster the knowledge, professionalism, and standards of its membership.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.

28-11-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the board of the Georgia General Assembly Training Institute.

“Institute” means the Georgia General Assembly Training Institute.

“Member of the General Assembly” means either an incumbent member or member-elect of the House of Representatives or Senate.

“Vinson Institute” means the Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.

28-11-4.
Availability of instructional classes and courses; payment of and reimbursement of expenses.

All members of the General Assembly shall be authorized and encouraged to attend and complete a series of instructional classes or courses relating to the organization and operation of state government in general, and the role and powers of the General Assembly in particular. Such courses or classes shall include, but not be limited to, such general topics as the Georgia Constitution, the role of each branch of state government, the organization of state government, the role of state government in the U.S. federal system, the relationship of state and local government, sources of state and local revenue, and the state budgeting process. Additionally, such courses or classes shall include, but not be limited to, topics specifically related to the General Assembly, such as constitutional and statutory law, bill drafting, the legislative process, committee operations, parliamentary rules of procedure, the appropriation process, legislative customs and traditions, duties and responsibilities of members, ethics and rules of conduct, legislative oversight of the executive branch, local legislation, constituent service, legislative use of computers, the Internet, distance learning, public policy issues on the legislative agenda, and such other matters as deemed necessary and appropriate by the board.

All expenses incurred by an incumbent member of the General Assembly related to the course of training and education authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section, including the reasonable costs of housing, travel, meals, instructors, and instructional materials, may be paid from state funds appropriated to the legislative branch for such purposes or from other such funds as become available. In addition, all such expenses shall constitute ordinary and necessary expenses for purposes of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-5-33 and may be reimbursed to members-elect of the General Assembly from campaign contributions.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.

28-11-5.
Georgia General Assembly Training Institute.

There is created and established in the legislative branch of government the Georgia General Assembly Training Institute. All costs of operating and conducting the institute shall be paid for from state funds appropriated for such purposes or from other such funds as become available.

With professional staff assistance from the Vinson Institute, the board shall have the power, duty, and authority to design, implement, and administer the course of training and education authorized by Code Section 28-11-4.

The courses of training and education authorized by Code Section 28-11-4 shall be conducted by the institute under such rules, regulations, procedures, policies, requirements, and standards as prescribed from time to time by the board. The initial course each biennium shall be the current Biennial Institute for Georgia Legislators at the University of Georgia’s Center for Continuing Education in Athens. Participation in the Biennial Institute shall be required to participate in other courses conducted by the institute, except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

The board shall establish guidelines and procedures to permit any member of the General Assembly who is unable to attend or complete one or more of the courses of training and education offered by the institute due to medical disability, providential cause, or any other reason deemed sufficient by the board to participate in the remaining courses of education and training provided for under Code Section 28-11-4 for the biennium.

The board shall perform such other duties and have such other powers and authority as may be necessary and proper or as prescribed by general law.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.

28-11-6.
Supervision of Georgia General Assembly Training Institute.

The institute shall be under the direction and supervision of the board of the Georgia General Assembly Training Institute. The board shall have the power and duty to organize and advise the institute so that the institute is operated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The board shall consist of seven members and shall be composed of six members appointed by the Legislative Services Committee and the director of the Vinson Institute who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member. In appointing members of the board, the Legislative Services Committee shall select three members from each house and shall attempt to broadly reflect the composition of the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.

28-11-7.
Authority of board to make contracts, leases, or agreements.

The board is authorized to make such contracts, leases, or agreements as may be necessary and convenient to carry out the duties and purposes for which the board is created. The board is authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with any person, firm, corporation, agency, or educational institution upon such terms and for such purposes as may be deemed advisable by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.

28-11-8.
Report on accomplishments of institute.

On or before February 1 of each year, the board shall file a report to the members of the Legislative Services Committee. The report shall include a summary of the accomplishments of the institute during the preceding calendar year, including, but not limited to, the total number of members of the General Assembly who attended the course of training and education offered by the institute; an outline of the institute’s programs for the current calendar year; an evaluation of the programs and services offered by the institute; and recommendations, if any, for legislation as may be necessary to improve the programs and services offered by the institute.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-11-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 874, § 1.